motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
addivenire/ZTI
avvenire/ZTI
circonvenire/ZI
contravvenire/ZI
convenire/ZI
divenire/ZI
intervenire/ZTXI
pervenire/ZI
prevenire/ZI
provenire/ZI
riconvenire/ZI
ridivenire/ZI
rinvenire/ZI
risovvenire/ZI
risvenire/ZI
rivenire/ZI
sopravvenire/ZI
sovvenire/ZI
svenire/ZI
venire/ZI
